Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-213
Acknowledgments of written instruments; insurance company; credit union; oath; prior acknowledgments validated.

Acknowledgments heretofore taken of any person to any written instrument given to or by an insurance company or credit union, or any oath administered to any member, director, elected officer, shareholder, appointive officer, employee, or agent of an insurance company or credit union, by any notary public, who was a member, shareholder, appointive officer, agent, or employee of the insurance company or credit union, and not a director or elected officer thereof, shall be deemed to be lawful, valid, and binding.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 3, p. 280;

R.S.1913, § 6198;

C.S.1922, § 5597;

C.S.1929, § 76-203;

R.S.1943, § 76-217;

Laws 1947, c. 244, § 1, p. 768;

Laws 1959, c. 347, § 1, p. 1233;

R.R.S.1943, § 76-217.03;

Laws 1976, LB 622, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1094, § 16.